xetex/share/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyphen/uni-ruhyphvl.tex
и6ст.
6тв.
6тл.
6тм.
6тс.
6тт.
6тх.
6тч.
6тш.
6фм.
6фт.
6фф.
6хл.
6хм.
6хт.
6цк.
6чв.
6чт.
6шв.
6шл.
6шц.
6ьб.
6ьв.
6ьд.
6ьк.
6ьм.
6ьп.
6ьс.
6ьт.
6ьф.
6ьц.
6ьш.
6дьм.
6зьб.
6льб.
6льв.
6льд.
6льк.
6льм.
6льп.
6льс.
6льт.
6льф.
6льц.
6льш.
6сьб.
6тьб.
6бсть.
6всть.
6гсть.
6дсть.
6йсть.
6мсть.
6нсть.
6рсть.
6тсть.
6фсть.
6ьсть.
6бль.
6мбль.
6брь.
6вль.
6гвь.
6гль.
6гнь.
6ждь.
6знь.
6зть.
6йль.
6йть.
6кль.
6лвь.
6лль.
6лть.
6лчь.
6мль.
6пль.
6прь.
6рбь.
6рдь.
6рзь.
6рнь.
6р6ть.
6рфь.
6сль.
6снь.
6тль.
6трь.
6фть.
6хрь.
6ьзь.
6льдт.
6льтр.
6льтск.
6льск.
6рльз.
6ндж.
6рск.
6нгс.
6рдж.
6здн.
6ндл.
6ндз.
6ндр.
6мбр.
6скр.
6нтр.
6нтш.
и6стр.
я6стр.
6згл.
6нстр.
6скл.
6нкс.
6лмс.
6нкт.
6йлд.
6ркт.
6ндс.
6кст.
6йтс.
6лст.
6йнт.
6рст.
6йкс.
6мпф.
6йвс.
6нгв.
6рдв.
6йдж.
6ртв.
6йбл.
6стм.
6йнс.
6н6ств.
6бств.
6вств.
6гств.
6дств.
6йств.
6мств.
6рств.
6тств.
6фств.
6льств.
6вск.
6дск.
6ндск.
6йск.
6нск.
6мск.
6ркск.
6нкск.
6кск.
6сск.
6тск.
6мтск.
6нтск.
6стск.
6ттск.
6фск.
6хск.
6вхск.
6шск.
6ньск.
6брьск.
6бь.
6вь.
6жь.
6зь.
6мь.
6нь.
6пь.
6рь.
6чь.
}
\hyphenation{
ес-ли
}
